California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(1) Except when the prescriber or the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to Section 4052 or
 pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6 orders otherwise, either the manufacturer’s trade name of the drug or the generic name and the name of the manufacturer. Commonly used abbreviations may be used. Preparations containing two or more active ingredients may be identified by the manufacturer’s trade name or the commonly used name or the principal active ingredients.

(2) The directions for the use of the drug.

(3) The name of the patient or patients.

(4) The name of the prescriber or, if applicable, the name of the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or
 protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to Section 4052 or pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6.

(5) The date of issue.

(6) The name and address of the pharmacy, and prescription number or other means of identifying the prescription.

(7) The strength of the drug or drugs dispensed.

(8) The quantity of the drug or drugs dispensed.

(9) The
 expiration date of the effectiveness of the drug dispensed.

(10) The condition or purpose for which the drug was prescribed if the condition or purpose is indicated on the prescription.

(11) (A) Commencing January 1, 2006, the physical description of the dispensed medication, including its color, shape, and any identification code that appears on the tablets or capsules, except as follows:

(i) Prescriptions dispensed by a veterinarian.

(ii) An exemption from the requirements of this paragraph shall be granted to a new drug for the first 120 days that the drug is on the market and for the 90 days during which the national reference file has no description on file.

(iii) Dispensed medications for which no physical description exists in a commercially available database.

(B) This paragraph applies to outpatient pharmacies only.

(C) The information required by this paragraph may be printed on an auxiliary label that is affixed to the prescription container.

(D) This paragraph shall not become operative if the board, prior to January 1, 2006, adopts regulations that mandate the same labeling requirements set forth in this paragraph.

(b) If a pharmacist dispenses a prescribed drug by means of a unit dose medication system, as defined by administrative regulation, for a patient in a skilled nursing, intermediate care, or other health care facility, the requirements of this section will be satisfied if the
 unit dose medication system contains the aforementioned information or the information is otherwise readily available at the time of drug administration.

(c) If a pharmacist dispenses a dangerous drug or device in a facility licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, it is not necessary to include on individual unit dose containers for a specific patient, the name of the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to Section 4052 or
 pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6.

(d) If a pharmacist dispenses a prescription drug for use in a facility licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, it is not necessary to include the information required in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) when the prescription drug is administered to a patient by a person licensed under the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)), the Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700)), or the Vocational Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840)), who is acting within the scope of practice.

(e) A pharmacist shall use professional judgment to provide a patient with directions for use that enhance the patient’s understanding of those directions, consistent with the prescriber’s
 instructions.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, a pharmacist may dispense a drug prescribed pursuant to Section 120582 of the Health and Safety Code and label the drug without the name of an individual for whom the drug is intended if the prescription includes the words “expedited partner therapy” or the letters “EPT.”

(2) A pharmacist who prescribes, dispenses, furnishes, or otherwise renders EPT, as authorized in subdivision (f), shall not be liable in,
 and shall not be subject to, a civil, criminal, or administrative action, sanction, or penalty for rendering EPT, if the use of EPT is in compliance with this section, except in cases of intentional misconduct, gross negligence, or wanton or reckless activity.

(3) A pharmacist who provides EPT under this section shall provide written notification that describes the right of an individual who receives EPT to consult with a pharmacist about the medication dispensed and additional information regarding possible drug interactions.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, a pharmacist may, at their discretion, dispense brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion without the name of the patient as required in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the name of the prescriber as required in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or the name and address of the pharmacy as required in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) if the prescription is labeled with a prescription number or other means of identifying the prescription.

(2) A pharmacist who dispenses, furnishes, or otherwise renders brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion, as authorized in paragraph (1), shall maintain a log with the prescription numbers and the information required in paragraphs (1) to (10),
 inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(3) Notwithstanding Section 4081, all records maintained under paragraph (2) shall not be open to inspection by law enforcement without a valid, court-issued subpoena.

(4) This subdivision does not prohibit the investigation of an activity that is punishable as a crime under the laws of this state, provided that records maintained under paragraph (2) are not shared with an individual or entity from another state.

(5) A pharmacist shall inform the patient that the pharmacist is dispensing brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion as authorized by this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 26.5.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4076.5.

(a) The board shall promulgate regulations that require, on or before January 1, 2011, a standardized, patient-centered, prescription drug label on all prescription medicine dispensed to patients in California.

(b) To ensure maximum public comment, the board shall hold public meetings statewide that are separate from its normally scheduled hearings in order to seek information from groups representing consumers, seniors, pharmacists or the practice of pharmacy, other health care professionals, and other interested parties.

(c) When developing the requirements for prescription drug labels, the board shall consider all of the following factors:

(1) Medical literacy research that points to increased understandability of labels.

(2) Improved directions for use.

(3) Improved font types and sizes.

(4) Placement of information that is patient-centered.

(5) The needs of patients with limited English proficiency.

(6) The needs of senior citizens.

(7) Technology requirements necessary to implement the standards.

(d) The board may exempt from the requirements of regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (a) prescriptions dispensed to a patient
 in a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, if the prescriptions are administered by a licensed health care professional. Prescriptions dispensed to a patient in a health facility that will not be administered by a licensed health care professional or that are provided to the patient upon discharge from the facility shall be subject to the requirements of this section and the regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (a). Nothing in this subdivision shall alter or diminish existing statutory and regulatory informed consent, patients’ rights, or pharmaceutical labeling and storage requirements, including, but not limited to, the requirements of Section 1418.9 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 72357, 72527, or 72528 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) (1) The board may exempt from the requirements of regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (a) a
 prescription dispensed to a patient if all of the following apply:

(A) The drugs are dispensed by a JCAHO-accredited home infusion or specialty pharmacy.

(B) The patient receives health-professional-directed education prior to the beginning of therapy by a nurse or pharmacist.

(C) The patient receives weekly or more frequent followup contacts by a nurse or pharmacist.

(D) Care is provided under a formal plan of care based upon a physician and surgeon’s orders.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), home infusion and specialty therapies include parenteral therapy or other forms of administration that require regular laboratory and patient monitoring.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 9.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4076.6.

(a) Upon the request of a patient or patient’s representative, a dispenser shall provide translated directions for use, which shall be printed on the prescription container, label, or on a supplemental document. If translated directions for use appear on a prescription container or label, the English-language version of the directions for use shall also appear on the container or label, whenever possible, and may appear on other areas of the label outside the patient-centered area. When it is not possible for the English-language directions for use to appear on the container or label, it shall be provided on a supplemental document.

(b) A dispenser may use translations made available by the board
 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1707.5 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations to comply with this section.

(c) A dispenser shall provide translated directions for use in the languages the board has made available, but shall not be required to provide translated directions for use beyond the languages that the board has made available or beyond the directions that the board has made available in translated form.

(d) A dispenser may provide their own translated directions for use to comply with the requirements of this section, and nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a dispenser from providing translated directions for use in languages beyond those that the board has made available or beyond the directions that the board has made available in translated
 form.

(e) A dispenser shall be responsible for the accuracy of the English-language directions for use provided to the patient. This section shall not affect a dispenser’s existing responsibility to correctly label a prescription pursuant to Section 4076.

(f) This section does not include prescriptions issued by a veterinarian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4076.7.

In addition to the requirements of Sections 4076 and 4076.5, whenever a prescription drug containing an opioid is dispensed to a patient for outpatient use, the pharmacy or practitioner dispensing the drug shall prominently display on the label or container, by means of a flag or other notification mechanism attached to the container, a notice that states “Caution: Opioid. Risk of overdose and addiction.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 693, Sec. 11.   (SB 1109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4076.8.

(a) If a person informs a pharmacy that the person identifies as a person who is blind, has low-vision, or is otherwise print disabled, the dispenser shall provide to the person or their authorized representative, at no additional cost, an accessible prescription label affixed to the container that is all of the following:

(1) Available to the person in a timely manner comparable to other patient wait times and lasting for at least the duration of the prescription.

(2) Appropriate to the disability and language of the person making the request through use of audible, large print, Braille, or translated
 directions as required pursuant to Section 4076.6.

(3) Conforms to the format-specific best practices established by the United States Access Board and the National Standards for Culturally and Linguistically Appropriate Services (CLAS) in Health and Health Care, also referred to as the National CLAS Standards.

(b) A dispenser shall ensure that the prescription label is compatible with the prescription reader if a reader is provided.

(c) If the accessible prescription label cannot be affixed to the container because it does not fit on the container, the dispenser, upon dispensing the prescription drug, shall provide the patient or their authorized representative with a supplemental document
 that meets the requirements specified in this section. 

(d) This section does not apply to prescription drugs dispensed and administered by an institutional pharmacy, correctional institution, or licensed correctional pharmacy. However, this section does apply to an institutional pharmacy when providing prescription drugs to a person with a disability for use by the individual upon their release from the health care facility.

(e) This
 section does not include prescriptions issued by a veterinarian.

(f) The board shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.

(g) As used in this section:

(1) “Institutional pharmacy” means a pharmacy that is part of, or is operated in conjunction with, a health care facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, with the exception of a licensed correctional pharmacy.

(2) “Prescription reader” means a device that is designed to audibly convey the information contained on the label of a prescription drug.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4077.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), no person shall dispense any dangerous drug upon prescription except in a container correctly labeled with the information required by Section 4076.

(b) Physicians, dentists, podiatrists, and veterinarians may personally furnish any dangerous drug prescribed by them to the patient for whom prescribed, provided that the drug is properly labeled to show all information required in Section 4076 except the prescription number.

(c) Devices that bear the legend “Caution: federal law restricts this device to sale by or on the order of a _____,” or words of similar meaning, are exempt from the requirements of Section 4076, and Section 111480 of the Health and Safety Code, when provided to patients in skilled nursing facilities or intermediate care facilities licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The following notification shall be affixed to all quantities of dimethyl sulfoxide (DMSO) prescribed by a physician, or dispensed by a pharmacy pursuant to the order of a physician in California: “Warning: DMSO may be hazardous to your health. Follow the directions of the physician who prescribed the DMSO for you.”

(e) The label of any retail package of DMSO shall include appropriate precautionary measures for proper handling and first aid treatment and a warning statement to keep the product out of reach of children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4078.

(a) (1) No person shall place a false or misleading label on a prescription.

(2) No prescriber shall direct that a prescription be labeled with any information that is false or misleading.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person may label a prescription, or a prescriber may direct that a prescription be labeled, with information about the drug that is false under either of the following circumstances:

(1) If the labeling is a necessary part of a clinical or investigational drug program approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration or a legitimate investigational drug project involving a drug previously approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(2) If, in the medical judgment of the prescriber, the labeling is appropriate for the proper treatment of the patient.

(c) The furnisher of a prescription labeled pursuant to subdivision (b) shall make, and retain for three years from the date of making, a record stating the manner in which the information on the prescription label varies from the actual drug in the container and documenting the order of the prescriber to so label the container. The prescriber shall make, and retain for at least three years, a record of his or her order to so label the container.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4079.

(a) A pharmacy shall inform a customer at the point of sale for a covered prescription drug whether the retail price is lower than the applicable cost-sharing amount for the prescription drug, unless the pharmacy automatically charges the customer the lower price.

(b) If the customer pays the retail price, the pharmacy shall submit the claim to the health care service plan or health insurer in the same manner as if the customer had purchased the prescription drug by paying the cost-sharing amount when submitted by the network pharmacy.

(c) The payment rendered shall constitute the applicable cost sharing and shall apply to
 the deductible, if any, and also to the maximum out-of-pocket limit in the same manner as if the enrollee had purchased the prescription drug by paying the cost-sharing amount.

(d) A contract provision that is inconsistent with this section is void and unenforceable.

(e) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(f) A violation of this provision shall not be grounds for disciplinary action or a criminal action. 

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 114, Sec. 2.   (AB 1803)   Effective July 12, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Authority of Inspectors [4080. - 4086.]

4080.

All stock of any dangerous drug or dangerous device or of shipments through a customs broker or carrier shall be, at all times during business hours, open to inspection by authorized officers of the law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4081.

(a) All records of manufacture and of sale, acquisition, receipt, shipment, or disposition of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices shall be at all times during business hours open to inspection by authorized officers of the law, and shall be preserved for at least three years from the date of making. A current inventory shall be kept by every manufacturer, wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, pharmacy, veterinary food-animal drug retailer, outsourcing facility, physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, laboratory, licensed correctional clinic, as defined in Section 4187, clinic, hospital, institution, or establishment holding a currently valid and unrevoked certificate, license, permit, registration, or exemption under Division 2
 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code or under Part 4 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code who maintains a stock of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices.

(b) The owner, officer, and partner of a pharmacy, wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, or veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall be jointly responsible, with the pharmacist-in-charge, responsible manager, or designated representative-in-charge, for maintaining the records and inventory described in this section.

(c) The pharmacist-in-charge, responsible manager, or designated representative-in-charge shall not be criminally responsible for acts of the owner, officer, partner, or employee that violate this section and of which the pharmacist-in-charge, responsible
 manager, or designated representative-in-charge had no knowledge, or in which they did not knowingly participate.

(d) Pharmacies that dispense nonprescription diabetes test devices pursuant to prescriptions shall retain records of acquisition and sale of those nonprescription diabetes test devices for at least three years from the date of making. The records shall be at all times during business hours open to inspection by authorized officers of the law.

(e) (1) In addition to the records described in subdivision (a), records that shall be maintained include policies and procedures related to pharmacy personnel and pharmacy operations. Such records shall be maintained in a readily retrievable format.

(2) Records described in paragraph (1) that are maintained electronically shall provide an audit trail for revisions and updates of each record.

(3) Prior versions of each electronically maintained record described in paragraph (2) shall be maintained in a readily retrievable format and include changes to the document, identification of the individual who made the change, and the date of each change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 27.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4082.

When called upon by an inspector, the owner or manager of any entity licensed by the board, or other store, shop, building, or premises retailing, wholesaling, or storing drugs or devices shall furnish the inspector with the names of the owner or owners, manager or managers, and employees together with a brief statement of the capacity in which these persons are employed on the premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4083.

(a) An inspector may issue an order of correction to a licensee directing the licensee to comply with this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The order of correction shall be in writing and shall describe in detail the nature and facts of the violation, including a reference to the statute or regulations violated.

(c) The order of correction shall inform the licensee that within 30 days of service of the order of correction, the licensee may do either of the following:

(1) Submit a written request
 for an office conference with the board’s executive officer to contest the order of correction.

(A) Upon a timely request, the executive officer, or designee of the executive officer, shall hold an office conference with the licensee or the licensee’s legal counsel or authorized representative. Unless so authorized by the executive officer, or designee of the executive officer, no individual other than the licensee’s legal counsel or authorized representative may accompany the licensee to the office conference.

(B) Prior to or at the office conference, the licensee may submit to the executive officer declarations and documents pertinent to the subject matter of the order of correction.

(C) The office conference is intended to be
 an informal proceeding and shall not be subject to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(D) The executive officer, or designee of the executive officer, may affirm, modify, or withdraw the order of correction. Within 14 calendar days from the date of the office conference, the executive officer, or designee of the executive officer, shall personally serve or send by certified mail to the licensee’s address of record with the board a written decision. This decision shall be deemed the final administrative decision concerning the order of correction.

(E) Judicial review of the decision may be had by filing a petition for a writ of mandate in accordance with the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 30 days of the date the decision was personally served or sent by certified mail. The judicial review shall extend to the question of whether or not there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion in the issuance of the order of correction.

(2) Comply with the order of correction and submit a written corrective action plan to the inspector documenting compliance. If an office conference is not requested pursuant to this section, compliance with the order of correction shall not constitute an admission of the violation noted in the order of correction.

(d) The order of correction shall be served upon the licensee personally or by certified mail at the licensee’s address of record with the board. If the licensee is served by certified mail, service shall be effective upon deposit in the United States mail.

(e) The licensee shall maintain and have readily available on the pharmacy premises a copy of the order of correction and corrective action plan for at least three years from the date of issuance of the order of correction.

(f) Nothing in this section shall in any way limit the board’s authority or ability to do any of the following:

(1) Issue a citation pursuant to Section 125.9, 148, or 4067 or pursuant to Section 1775, 1775.15, 1777, or 1778 of Title 16 of the
 California Code of Regulations.

(2) Issue a letter of admonishment pursuant to Section 4315.

(3) Institute disciplinary proceedings pursuant to Article 19 (commencing with Section 4300).

(g) Unless a writ of mandate is filed, a citation issued, a letter of admonishment issued, or a disciplinary proceeding instituted, an order of correction shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 6.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

4084.

(a) When a board inspector finds, or has probable cause to believe, that any dangerous drug or dangerous device is adulterated, misbranded, or counterfeit, the board inspector shall affix a tag or other marking to that dangerous drug or dangerous device. The board inspector shall give notice to the person that the dangerous drug or dangerous device bearing the tag or marking has been embargoed.

(b) When a board inspector has found that an embargoed dangerous drug or dangerous device is not adulterated, misbranded, or counterfeit, a board inspector shall remove the tag or other marking.

(c) A board inspector may secure a sample or specimen of a dangerous drug or dangerous device. If the board inspector obtains a sample prior to leaving the premises, the board inspector shall leave a receipt describing the sample.

(d) For the purposes of this article, “counterfeit” shall have the meaning defined in Section 109905 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) For the purposes of this article, “adulterated” shall have the meaning defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 111250) of Chapter 6 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) For the purposes of this article, “misbranded” shall have the meaning defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 111330) of Chapter 6 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4084.1.

The board may embargo any nonprescription diabetes test device that a board inspector finds or has probable cause to believe was not purchased either directly from the manufacturer or from the nonprescription diabetes test device manufacturer’s authorized distributors as identified in Section 4160.5. For the purposes of this section, the board shall embargo these products following the same procedures and protections used for adulterated, misbranded, or counterfeit drugs or dangerous devices in Sections 4084, 4085, and 4086.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 139, Sec. 4.   (AB 602)   Effective July 31, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4085.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to remove, sell, or dispose of an embargoed dangerous drug or dangerous device without permission of the board.

(b) When a board inspector has reasonable cause to believe, that the embargo will be violated, a board inspector may remove the embargoed dangerous drug or dangerous device from the premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 857, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4086.

(a) If a dangerous drug or dangerous device is alleged to be adulterated or counterfeit, the board shall commence proceedings in the superior court in whose jurisdiction the dangerous drug or dangerous device is located, for condemnation of the dangerous drug or dangerous device.

(b) If the court finds that an embargoed dangerous drug or dangerous device is adulterated or counterfeit, the dangerous drug or dangerous device shall, after entry of the judgment, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant or owner, under the supervision of the board. All court costs and fees and all reasonable costs incurred by the board in investigating and prosecuting the action, including, but not limited to, the costs of storage and testing, shall be paid by the claimant or owner of the dangerous drug or dangerous device.

(c) A superior court of this state may condemn any dangerous drug or dangerous device pursuant to this article. In the absence of an order, the dangerous drug or dangerous device may be destroyed under the supervision of the board who has the written consent of the owner, his or her attorney, or authorized representative. If the board cannot ascertain ownership of the dangerous drug or dangerous device within 30 days of establishing an embargo, the board may destroy the dangerous drug or dangerous device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 857, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. General Requirements [4100. - 4107.5.]

4100.

Within 30 days after changing his or her address of record with the board or after changing his or her name according to law, a pharmacist, intern pharmacist, technician, designated representative, designated representative-3PL, or designated representative-reverse distributor shall notify the executive officer of the board of the change of address or change of name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 598, Sec. 6.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.

(a) A pharmacist may take charge of and act as the pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy upon application by the pharmacy and approval by the board. A pharmacist-in-charge who ceases to act as the pharmacist-in-charge of the pharmacy shall notify the board in writing within 30 days of the date of that change in status.

(b) A designated representative or a pharmacist may take charge of, and act as, the designated representative-in-charge of a wholesaler or veterinary food-animal drug retailer upon application by the wholesaler or veterinary food-animal drug retailer and approval by the board. A designated representative-in-charge who ceases to act as the designated
 representative-in-charge at that
 entity shall notify the board in writing within 30 days of the date of that change in status.

(c) A designated representative-3PL may take charge of, and act as, the responsible manager of a third-party logistics provider upon application by the third-party logistics provider and approval by the board. A
 responsible manager who ceases to act as the responsible manager at that entity shall notify the board in writing within 30 days of the date of that change in status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 507, Sec. 11.   (AB 2605)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

(a) (1) As provided in this section, all facilities licensed by the board shall complete the self-assessment process by July 1 of every odd-numbered year, unless otherwise established in this section.

(2) The self-assessment process shall be completed on a form provided by the board pursuant to this section.

(b) The form shall be completed to assess the facility’s compliance with federal and state laws identified on the form. For each “no” response, the facility shall undertake a written corrective action or action plan to come into compliance with the law.

(c) (1) The form shall be signed under penalty of perjury by the designated individual, pursuant to this section, and cosigned by the owner or authorized officer of the facility acknowledging they have read, reviewed, and completed the self-assessment to the best of their professional ability and acknowledge that failure to correct any deficiency identified could result in action by the board.

(2) The completed form shall be kept on file in the facility and made available to the board or its designee upon request.

(d) The facility shall use the appropriate designated form based on the type of license, as described in this subdivision and as posted on the board’s internet website.

(1) The Community Pharmacy Self-Assessment/Hospital Outpatient Self-Assessment form shall be completed by the pharmacist-in-charge. In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), the form shall be completed within 30 days of any of the following:

(A) A new pharmacy license is issued.

(B) There is a change of pharmacist-in-charge, and they become the new pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy.

(C) There is a change in the location of a pharmacy to a new address.

(2) The Hospital Pharmacy Self-Assessment form shall be completed by the pharmacist-in-charge. In addition to the requirements in
 subdivision (a), the form shall be completed within 30 days of any of the following:

(A) A new pharmacy license is issued.

(B) There is a change of pharmacist-in-charge, and they become the new pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy.

(C) There is a change in the location of a pharmacy to a new address.

(3) The Automated Drug Delivery System Self-Assessment form shall be completed by the pharmacist-in-charge of the pharmacy operating the system. In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), the form shall be completed within 30 days of any of the following:

(A) A new pharmacy license is
 issued.

(B) There is a change of pharmacist-in-charge, and they become the new pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy.

(C) There is a change in the location of a pharmacy to a new address.

(4) The Compounding Self-Assessment form shall be completed by the pharmacist-in-charge of each pharmacy that compounds drug products. In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), the form shall be completed within 30 days of any of the following:

(A) A new pharmacy license is issued.

(B) There is a change of pharmacist-in-charge, and they become the new pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy.

(C) There is a change in the location of a pharmacy to a new address.

(5) The Surgical Clinic Self-Assessment form shall be completed by the consulting pharmacist of the surgical clinic and cosigned by the professional director.

(6) The Wholesaler/Third-Party Logistics Provider Self-Assessment form shall be completed by the designated representative-in-charge or the wholesaler or responsible manager of the third-party logistics provider. In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), the form shall be completed within 30 days of any of the following:

(A) A new license is issued.

(B) There is
 a change of designated representative-in-charge or responsible manager, and they become the new designated representative-in-charge or responsible manager.

(C) There is a change in the location to a new address.

(7) The Outsourcing Facility Self-Assessment form shall be completed by the designated quality control personnel. In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), the form shall be completed within 30 days of any of the following:

(A) A new license is issued.

(B) There is a change in the designated quality control personnel.

(C) There is a change in the location to a new
 address.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 28.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

Notwithstanding Section 2038, or any other provision of law, a pharmacist may take a person’s blood pressure and may inform the person of the results, render an opinion as to whether the reading is within a high, low, or normal range, and may advise the person to consult a physician of the person’s choice. Pharmacists rendering this service shall utilize commonly accepted community standards in rendering opinions and referring patients to physicians. Enforcement of this section is vested in the Board of Pharmacy of the State of California. Any pharmacist who performs this service shall not be in violation of Section 2052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

(a) Every pharmacy shall have in place procedures for taking action to protect the public when a licensed individual employed by or with the pharmacy is discovered or known to be chemically, mentally, or physically impaired to the extent it affects his or her ability to practice the profession or occupation authorized by his or her license, or is discovered or known to have engaged in the theft, diversion, or self-use of dangerous drugs.
